Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.073

Massage therapist examination.

(1) Applicants for the massage therapist license examination must demonstrate to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a)(i) Effective June 1, 1988, successful completion of a course of study in an approved massage program or transfer program; or

(ii) Effective June 1, 1988, successful completion of an apprenticeship program established by the board; and

(b) Be eighteen years of age or older.

(2) The board or its designee shall examine each massage therapist applicant in a written examination determined most effective on subjects appropriate to the massage scope of practice. The subjects may include anatomy, kinesiology, physiology, pathology, principles of human behavior, massage theory and practice, hydrotherapy, hygiene, first aid, Washington law pertaining to the practice of massage, and such other subjects as the board may deem useful to test applicant's fitness to practice massage therapy. Such examinations shall be limited in purpose to determining whether the applicant possesses the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to practice competently.

(3) All records of a massage therapist candidate's performance shall be preserved for a period of not less than one year after the board has made and published decisions thereupon. All examinations shall be conducted by the board under fair and impartial methods as determined by the secretary.

(4) A massage therapist applicant who fails to make the required grade in the first examination is entitled to take up to two additional examinations upon the payment of a fee for each subsequent examination determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250. Upon failure of three examinations, the secretary may invalidate the original application and require such remedial education as is required by the board before admission to future examinations.

(5) The board may approve an examination prepared or administered, or both, by a private testing agency or association of licensing boards for use by a massage therapist applicant in meeting the licensing requirement.

[ 2016 c 53 s 4; 2016 c 41 s 7; 2012 c 137 s 11; 1995 c 198 s 17; 1991 c 3 s 258; 1987 c 443 s 8.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2016 c 41 s 7 and by 2016 c 53 s 4, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.